Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1031, as
last amended by Section 397, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1031), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1031. A. Except as provided in subsection B, C, D, or
E of this section, any person violating any of the provisions of
paragraph 1, 2, 3, or 5 of subsection A of Section 1029 or Section
1030 of this title shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail
for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one (1) year or by
fines as follows: a fine not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00) upon the first conviction for violation of any
of such provisions, a fine not more than Five Thousand Dollars
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1446 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

($5, 000.00) upon the second conviction for violation of any of such
provisions, and a fine not more than Seven Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($7,500.00) upon the third or subsequent convictions for
violation of any of such provisions, or by both such imprisonment
and fine. In addition, the court may require a term of community
service not less than forty (40) nor more than eighty (80) hours.
The court in which any such conviction is had shall notify the
county superintendent of public health of such conviction.
B. Any person who engages in an act of prostitution with
knowledge that he or she is infected with the human immunodeficiency
virus shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D1 felony offense
punishable by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through
F E of Section 20N of this title.
C. Any person who engages in an act of child prostitution sex
trafficking as defined in Section 1030 of this title shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a Class B1 felony offense punishable by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not
more less than ten (10) years and by fines as follows: a fine not
more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) upon the first
conviction, a fine not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00)
upon the second conviction, and a fine not more than Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) upon the third or subsequent
convictions.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1446 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. Any person violating any of the provisions of Section 1029
or 1030 of this title within one thousand (1,000) feet of a school
or church shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D1 felony
offense and shall be punished by imprisonment as provided for in
subsections B through F E of Section 20N of this title, or by fines
as follows: a fine not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($2,500.00) upon the first conviction for violation of any of such
provisions, a fine not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00)
upon the second conviction for violation of any of such provisions,
and a fine not more than Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($7,500.00) upon the third or subsequent convictions for violation
of any of such provisions, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
In addition, the court may require a term of community service not
less than forty (40) nor more than eighty (80) hours. The court in
which any such conviction is had shall notify the county
superintendent of public health of such conviction.
E. Any person violating paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section
1029 of this title shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B4
felony offense and shall be punished in accordance with the
provisions of subsection B of Section 1040.57 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1446 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)